North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-24 Maps and Plats

11-24-01.
Board of county commissioners may provide for copies of plats and plans.

If the board of county commissioners deems it necessary, in order to preserve from mutilation and impairment the plats and plans on file in the office of the recorder, it may cause copies of the originals on file to be made by a competent engineer on sheets of tracing cloth. The board may require a bond of the engineer covering a period of five years.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 260, §§ 1, 2; C.L. 1913, §§ 3953, 3954; R.C. 1943, § 11-2401; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

11-24-02.
Requirements for copies of plats and plans.

The sheets of tracing cloth on which copies of the original plats and plans are made shall be not less than thirty by twenty inches [762.00 by 508.00 millimeters] nor more than thirty-one by twenty-one inches [787.40 by 533.40 millimeters] and shall be lettered in a workmanlike manner with suitable titles transcribed on them, numbered, lettered, and made up in one or more books which are bound in suitable covers so that they may be readily removed for the purpose of making prints. These copies shall serve as negatives for prints and shall be certified by the engineer in charge of the work to be correct copies of the original.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 260, § 1; C.L. 1913, § 3953; R.C. 1943, § 11-2402.

11-24-03.
Written and printed matter on plat to be typewritten and bound.

All descriptions, dedications, and written and printed matter that may be found on the original plats and plans shall be typewritten, properly paged, indexed, and bound in books to correspond with the copies of the plats and plans which serve as negatives. They shall be certified by the engineer who has charge of the work to be correct copies.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 260, § 3; C.L. 1913, § 3955; R.C. 1943, § 11-2403.

11-24-04.
Copies of plats and typewritten copies of descriptions not used by public.

The negatives for the prints and the typewritten copies of the descriptions and dedications shall be filed and not used by the public except by persons authorized by the board of county commissioners to make additional copies.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 260, § 4; C.L. 1913, § 3956; R.C. 1943, § 11-2404.

11-24-05.
Copies of plats and descriptions made for general use.

The engineer who shall make copies of the original plats and plans on file in any county shall furnish for general use one set of the prints, from the negatives, either on paper or cloth. Such prints shall be placed in substantial covers and bound in one or more books. Each book shall be furnished with an index, and one set of descriptions and dedications shall be bound into each such book and indexed to correspond with the prints. The board of county commissioners may replace from time to time any of the prints and typewritten sheets which have become mutilated or worn out and may cause to be made prints and typewritten descriptions of all new plats and plans that are filed with the recorder.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 260, § 5; C.L. 1913, § 3957; R.C. 1943, § 11-2405; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

11-24-06.
Board may replace copies of plats and descriptions — Copies of new plats made.

The board of county commissioners may replace from time to time any of the prints and typewritten sheets which have become mutilated or worn out and may cause to be made prints and typewritten descriptions of all new plats and plans that are filed with the recorder.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 260, § 5; C.L. 1913, § 3957; R.C. 1943, § 11-2406; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

11-24-07.
Rate of pay for making copies of plats.

The board of county commissioners shall not pay more than twenty dollars per sheet for copies of original plats and plans. This sum shall include the work necessary for making the negatives, one set of prints, the necessary covers, and two typewritten copies of descriptions and dedications.

Source:

S.L. 1911, ch. 260, § 6; C.L. 1913, § 3958; R.C. 1943, § 11-2407.